en_US.aff
FLAG num
SFX 57 Y 77	
SFX 57 0 ති  .	
SFX 57 0 ත්වා  .	
SFX 57 0 නවා  .	
SFX 57 0 නවාලා  .	
SFX 57 0 නු  .	
SFX 57 0 න්න  .	
SFX 57 0 න්නීය  .	
SFX 57 0 න්නෙමි  .	
SFX 57 0 න්නෙමිවා  .	
SFX 57 0 න්නෙමු  .	
SFX 57 0 න්නෙමුවා  .	
SFX 57 0 න්නෙහි  .	
SFX 57 0 න්නෙහිවා  .	
SFX 57 0 න්නේය  .	
SFX 57 0 න්නෝය  .	
SFX 57 ි ියන්  .	
SFX 57 ි ියල්ලා  .	
SFX 57 0 මි  .	
SFX 57 0 මිවා  .	
SFX 57 0 මු  .	
SFX 57 0 මුවා  .	
SFX 57 0 යි  .	
SFX 57 0 ව  .	
SFX 57 0 වති  .	
SFX 57 0 වන්නීය  .	
SFX 57 0 වන්නෙමි  .	
SFX 57 0 වන්නෙමු  .	
SFX 57 0 වන්නෙහි  .	
SFX 57 0 වන්නෙහු  .	
SFX 57 0 වන්නේය  .	
SFX 57 0 වන්නෝය  .	
SFX 57 0 වමි  .	
SFX 57 0 වමු  .	
SFX 57 0 වයි  .	
SFX 57 0 වහි  .	
SFX 57 0 වහු  .	
SFX 57 0 වු  .	
SFX 57 0 හි  .	
SFX 57 0 හිවා  .	
SFX 57 0 හු  .	
SFX 57 0 හුවා  .	
SFX 57 0 මින්  .	
SFX 57 0 ිද  .	
SFX 57 0 න්නට  .	
SFX 57 0 වන්නට  .	
SFX 57 0 නලද  .	
SFX 57 0 නුලැබූ  .	
SFX 57 0 වමින්  .	
SFX 57 0 ද්දී  .	
SFX 57 0 නලදී  .	
SFX 57 0 ුණු  .	
SFX 57 ි ුනෙමි  .	
SFX 57 ි ුනෙමු  .	
SFX 57 ි ුනෙහි  .	
SFX 57 ි ුනෙහු  .	
SFX 57 ි ුනාය  .	
SFX 57 ි ුනේය  .	
SFX 57 ි ුනෝය  .	
SFX 57 ි ේ  .	
SFX 57 ි ෙමි  .	
SFX 57 ි ෙමු  .	
SFX 57 ි ෙහි  .	
SFX 57 ි ෙහු  .	
SFX 57 ි ෙයි  .	
SFX 57 ි ෙති  .	
SFX 57 0 වෙයි  .	
SFX 57 0 වෙති  .	
SFX 57 0 වේ  .	
SFX 57 ි ිය  .	
SFX 57 ි ුනොත්  .	
SFX 57 ි ුනේ  .	
SFX 57 0 න්නේ  .	
SFX 57 0 න  .	
SFX 57 0 නට  .	
SFX 57 0 වා  .	
SFX 57 0 වන්නේ  .	
SFX 57 0 නුයේ  .	

SFX 58 Y 71	
SFX 58 0 ති  .	
SFX 58 0 ත්වා  .	
SFX 58 0 නවා  .	
SFX 58 0 නවාලා  .	
SFX 58 0 නු  .	
SFX 58 0 න්න  .	
SFX 58 0 න්නීය  .	
SFX 58 0 න්නෙමි  .	
SFX 58 0 න්නෙමිවා  .	
SFX 58 0 න්නෙමු  .	
SFX 58 0 න්නෙමුවා  .	
SFX 58 0 න්නෙහි  .	
SFX 58 0 න්නෙහිවා  .	
SFX 58 0 න්නේය  .	
SFX 58 0 න්නෝය  .	
SFX 58 ‍ෙ ියන්  .	
SFX 58 ‍ෙ ියල්ලා  .	
SFX 58 0 මි  .	
SFX 58 0 මිවා  .	
SFX 58 0 මු  .	
SFX 58 0 මුවා  .	
SFX 58 0 යි  .	
SFX 58 0 ව  .	
SFX 58 0 වන්නීය  .	
SFX 58 0 වන්නෙමි  .	
SFX 58 0 වන්නෙමු  .	
SFX 58 0 වන්නෙහි  .	
SFX 58 0 වන්නෙහු  .	
SFX 58 0 වන්නේය  .	
SFX 58 0 වන්නෝය  .	
SFX 58 0 වමි  .	
SFX 58 0 වමු  .	
SFX 58 0 වයි  .	
SFX 58 0 වති  .	
SFX 58 0 වහි  .	
SFX 58 0 වහු  .	
SFX 58 0 වමින්  .	
SFX 58 0 වන්නට  .	
SFX 58 0 වු  .	
SFX 58 0 හි  .	
SFX 58 0 හිවා  .	
SFX 58 0 හු  .	
SFX 58 0 හුවා  .	
SFX 58 0 මින්  .	
SFX 58 ‍ෙ ී  .	
SFX 58 0 න්නට  .	
SFX 58 0 නලද  .	
SFX 58 0 නුලැබූ  .	
SFX 58 0 ද්දී  .	
SFX 58 0 නලදී  .	
SFX 58 ‍ෙ ුණු  .	
SFX 58 ‍ෙ ූ  .	
SFX 58 ‍ෙ ුනෙමි  .	
SFX 58 ‍ෙ ුනෙමු  .	
SFX 58 ‍ෙ ුනෙහි  .	
SFX 58 ‍ෙ ුනෙහු  .	
SFX 58 ‍ෙ ුනේය  .	
SFX 58 ‍ෙ ුනාය  .	
SFX 58 ‍ෙ ුනෝය  .	
SFX 58 ‍ෙ වෙයි  .	
SFX 58 ‍ෙ වෙති  .	
SFX 58 ‍ෙ වේ  .	
SFX 58 ‍ෙ ිය  .	
SFX 58 ‍ෙ ුනොත්  .	
SFX 58 ‍ෙ ුනේ  .	
SFX 58 0 න්නේ  .	
SFX 58 0 න  .	
SFX 58 0 නට  .	
SFX 58 0 වා  .	
SFX 58 0 වන්නේ  .	
SFX 58 0 නුයේ  .	

SFX 59 Y 62	
SFX 59 0 ති  .	
SFX 59 0 ත්වා  .	
SFX 59 0 නවා  .	
SFX 59 0 නවාලා  .	
SFX 59 0 නු  .	
SFX 59 0 න්න  .	
SFX 59 0 න්නීය  .	
SFX 59 0 න්නෙමි  .	
SFX 59 0 න්නෙමිවා  .	
SFX 59 0 න්නෙමු  .	
SFX 59 0 න්නෙමුවා  .	
SFX 59 0 න්නෙහි  .	
SFX 59 0 න්නෙහිවා  .	
SFX 59 0 න්නේය  .	
SFX 59 0 න්නෝය  .	
SFX 59 ‍ෙ ියන්  .	
SFX 59 ‍ෙ ියල්ලා  .	
SFX 59 0 මි  .	
SFX 59 0 මිවා  .	
SFX 59 0 මු  .	
SFX 59 0 මුවා  .	
SFX 59 0 යි  .	
SFX 59 0 ව  .	
SFX 59 0 වන්නීය  .	
SFX 59 0 වන්නෙමි  .	
SFX 59 0 වන්නෙමු  .	
SFX 59 0 වන්නෙහි  .	
SFX 59 0 වන්නෙහු  .	
SFX 59 0 වන්නේය  .	
SFX 59 0 වන්නෝය  .	
SFX 59 0 වමි  .	
SFX 59 0 වමු  .	
SFX 59 0 වයි  .	
SFX 59 0 වති  .	
SFX 59 0 වහි  .	
SFX 59 0 වහු  .	
SFX 59 0 වමින්  .	
SFX 59 0 වන්නට  .	
SFX 59 0 වු  .	
SFX 59 0 හි  .	
SFX 59 0 හිවා  .	
SFX 59 0 හු  .	
SFX 59 0 හුවා  .	
SFX 59 0 මින්  .	
SFX 59 ‍ෙ ී  .	
SFX 59 0 න්නට  .	
SFX 59 0 නලද  .	
SFX 59 0 නුලැබූ  .	
SFX 59 0 ද්දී  .	
SFX 59 0 නලදී  .	
SFX 59 ‍ෙ ුණු  .	
SFX 59 ‍ෙ ූ  .	
SFX 59 ‍ෙ ුනෙමි  .	
SFX 59 ‍ෙ ුනෙමු  .	
SFX 59 ‍ෙ ුනෙහි  .	
SFX 59 ‍ෙ ුනෙහු  .	
SFX 59 ‍ෙ ුනේය  .	
SFX 59 ‍ෙ ුනාය  .	
SFX 59 ‍ෙ ුනෝය  .	
SFX 59 0 වෙයි  .	
SFX 59 0 වෙති  .	
SFX 59 0 වේ  .	

SFX 60 Y 70	
SFX 60 0 ති  .	
SFX 60 0 ත්වා  .	
SFX 60 0 නවා  .	
SFX 60 0 නවාලා  .	
SFX 60 0 නු  .	
SFX 60 0 න්න  .	
SFX 60 0 න්නීය  .	
SFX 60 0 න්නෙමි  .	
SFX 60 0 න්නෙමිවා  .	
SFX 60 0 න්නෙමු  .	
SFX 60 0 න්නෙමුවා  .	
SFX 60 0 න්නෙහි  .	
SFX 60 0 න්නෙහිවා  .	
SFX 60 0 න්නේය  .	
SFX 60 0 න්නෝය  .	
SFX 60 ‍ෙ ියන්  .	
SFX 60 ‍ෙ ියල්ලා  .	
SFX 60 0 මි  .	
SFX 60 0 මිවා  .	
SFX 60 0 මු  .	
SFX 60 0 මුවා  .	
SFX 60 0 යි  .	
SFX 60 0 ව  .	
SFX 60 0 වන්නීය  .	
SFX 60 0 වන්නෙමි  .	
SFX 60 0 වන්නෙමු  .	
SFX 60 0 වන්නෙහි  .	
SFX 60 0 වන්නෙහු  .	
SFX 60 0 වන්නේය  .	
SFX 60 0 වන්නෝය  .	
SFX 60 0 වමි  .	
SFX 60 0 වමු  .	
SFX 60 0 වයි  .	
SFX 60 0 වති  .	
SFX 60 0 වහි  .	
SFX 60 0 වහු  .	
SFX 60 0 වමින්  .	
SFX 60 0 වන්නට  .	
SFX 60 0 වු  .	
SFX 60 0 හි  .	
SFX 60 0 හිවා  .	
SFX 60 0 හු  .	
SFX 60 0 හුවා  .	
SFX 60 0 මින්  .	
SFX 60 ‍ෙ ී  .	
SFX 60 0 න්නට  .	
SFX 60 0 නලද  .	
SFX 60 0 නුලැබූ  .	
SFX 60 0 ද්දී  .	
SFX 60 0 නලදී  .	
SFX 60 ‍ෙ ුන්  .	
SFX 60 ‍ෙ ුන්නෙමි  .	
SFX 60 ‍ෙ ුන්නෙමු  .	
SFX 60 ‍ෙ ුන්නෙහි  .	
SFX 60 ‍ෙ ුන්නෙහු  .	
SFX 60 ‍ෙ ුන්නේය  .	
SFX 60 ‍ෙ ුන්නාය  .	
SFX 60 ‍ෙ ුන්නෝය  .	
SFX 60 0 වෙයි  .	
SFX 60 0 වෙති  .	
SFX 60 0 වේ  .	
SFX 60 ‍ෙ ිය  .	
SFX 60 ‍ෙ ුන්නොත්  .	
SFX 60 ‍ෙ ුන්නේ  .	
SFX 60 0 න්නේ  .	
SFX 60 0 න  .	
SFX 60 0 නට  .	
SFX 60 0 වා  .	
SFX 60 0 වන්නේ  .	
SFX 60 0 නුයේ  .	

SFX 61 Y 67	
SFX 61 0 ති  .	
SFX 61 0 ත්වා  .	
SFX 61 0 නවා  .	
SFX 61 0 නවාලා  .	
SFX 61 0 නු  .	
SFX 61 0 න්න  .	
SFX 61 0 න්නීය  .	
SFX 61 0 න්නෙමි  .	
SFX 61 0 න්නෙමිවා  .	
SFX 61 0 න්නෙමු  .	
SFX 61 0 න්නෙමුවා  .	
SFX 61 0 න්නෙහි  .	
SFX 61 0 න්නෙහිවා  .	
SFX 61 0 න්නේය  .	
SFX 61 0 න්නෝය  .	
SFX 61 ‍ෙ ියන්  .	
SFX 61 ‍ෙ ියල්ලා  .	
SFX 61 0 මි  .	
SFX 61 0 මිවා  .	
SFX 61 0 මු  .	
SFX 61 0 මුවා  .	
SFX 61 0 යි  .	
SFX 61 0 ව  .	
SFX 61 0 වන්නීය  .	
SFX 61 0 වන්නෙමි  .	
SFX 61 0 වන්නෙමු  .	
SFX 61 0 වන්නෙහි  .	
SFX 61 0 වන්නෙහු  .	
SFX 61 0 වන්නේය  .	
SFX 61 0 වන්නෝය  .	
SFX 61 0 වමි  .	
SFX 61 0 වමු  .	
SFX 61 0 වයි  .	
SFX 61 0 වති  .	
SFX 61 0 වහි  .	
SFX 61 0 වහු  .	
SFX 61 0 වමින්  .	
SFX 61 0 වන්නට  .	
SFX 61 0 වු  .	
SFX 61 0 හි  .	
SFX 61 0 හිවා  .	
SFX 61 0 හු  .	
SFX 61 0 හුවා  .	
SFX 61 0 මින්  .	
SFX 61 ‍ෙ ී  .	
SFX 61 0 න්නට  .	
SFX 61 0 නලද  .	
SFX 61 0 නුලැබූ  .	
SFX 61 0 ද්දී  .	
SFX 61 0 නලදී  .	
SFX 61 ‍ෙ ුණු  .	
SFX 61 ‍ෙ ුනෙමි  .	
SFX 61 ‍ෙ ුනෙමු  .	
SFX 61 ‍ෙ ුනෙහි  .	
SFX 61 ‍ෙ ුනෙහු  .	
SFX 61 ‍ෙ ුනේය  .	
SFX 61 ‍ෙ ුනාය  .	
SFX 61 ‍ෙ ුනෝය  .	
SFX 61 ‍ෙ ිය  .	
SFX 61 ‍ෙ ුනොත්  .	
SFX 61 ‍ෙ ුනේ  .	
SFX 61 0 න්නේ  .	
SFX 61 0 න  .	
SFX 61 0 නට  .	
SFX 61 0 ්වා  .	
SFX 61 ‍ෙ ්වන්නේ  .	
SFX 61 0 නුයේ  .	

SFX 63 0 76	
SFX 63 ් ිති  .	
SFX 63 ් ිත්වා  .	
SFX 63 0 නවා  .	
SFX 63 0 නවාලා  .	
SFX 63 0 නු  .	
SFX 63 ් ු  .	
SFX 63 0 නීය  .	
SFX 63 0 නෙමි  .	
SFX 63 0 නෙමිවා  .	
SFX 63 0 නෙමු  .	
SFX 63 0 නෙමුවා  .	
SFX 63 0 නෙහි  .	
SFX 63 0 නෙහිවා  .	
SFX 63 0 නේය  .	
SFX 63 0 නෝය  .	
SFX 63 ් ින්  .	
SFX 63 ් ිල්ලා  .	
SFX 63 ් ිමි  .	
SFX 63 ් ිමිවා  .	
SFX 63 ් ිමු  .	
SFX 63 ් ිමුවා  .	
SFX 63 ් ියි  .	
SFX 63 0 ව  .	
SFX 63 0 වති  .	
SFX 63 0 වන්නීය  .	
SFX 63 0 වන්නෙමි  .	
SFX 63 0 වන්නෙමු  .	
SFX 63 0 වන්නෙහි  .	
SFX 63 0 වන්නෙහු  .	
SFX 63 0 වන්නේය  .	
SFX 63 0 වන්නෝය  .	
SFX 63 0 වමි  .	
SFX 63 0 වමු  .	
SFX 63 0 වයි  .	
SFX 63 0 වහි  .	
SFX 63 0 වහු  .	
SFX 63 ් ිවු  .	
SFX 63 0 හි  .	
SFX 63 0 හිවා  .	
SFX 63 0 හු  .	
SFX 63 0 හුවා  .	
SFX 63 0 ිමින්  .	
SFX 63 0 න  .	
SFX 63 0 නට  .	
SFX 63 0 වන්නට  .	
SFX 63 0 නලද  .	
SFX 63 ් ුලැබූ  .	
SFX 63 0 වමින්  .	
SFX 63 ් ිද්දී  .	
SFX 63 0 නලදී  .	
SFX 63 ් ුණු  .	
SFX 63 0 ත්  .	
SFX 63 0 ත්තෙමි  .	
SFX 63 0 ත්තෙමු  .	
SFX 63 0 ත්තෙහි  .	
SFX 63 0 ත්තෙහු  .	
SFX 63 0 ත්තාය  .	
SFX 63 0 ත්තේය  .	
SFX 63 0 ත්තෝය  .	
SFX 63 ් ේ  .	
SFX 63 0 ෙමි  .	
SFX 63 0 ෙමු  .	
SFX 63 0 ෙහි  .	
SFX 63 0 ෙහු  .	
SFX 63 0 ෙයි  .	
SFX 63 0 ෙති  .	
SFX 63 0 වෙයි  .	
SFX 63 0 වෙති  .	
SFX 63 0 වේ  .	
SFX 63 0 ත  .	
SFX 63 0 ත්තොත්  .	
SFX 63 0 ත්තේ  .	
SFX 63 0 නේ  .	
SFX 63 0 නා  .	
SFX 63 0 නට  .	
SFX 63 0 වන්නේ  .	
