en_US.dic
උගනි/57
දැනෙ/58
හැපෙ/58
ලැබෙ/58
බැලෙ/58
ගැටෙ/58
වැටෙ/58
වැදෙ/58
හැරෙ/58
මැරෙ/58
සැරසෙ/58
පැවරෙ/58
වැටහෙ/58
ගැලපෙ/58
පැටළෙ/58
වැජඹෙ/58
වැලපෙ/58
හැප්පෙ/58
දික්ගැස්සෙ/58
හැසිරෙ/58
පැතිරෙ/58
හැඳිනෙ/58
පැමිණෙ/58
වැහැරෙ/58
තේරෙ/58
යෙදෙ/58
පෙළඹෙ/58
හෙල්ලෙ/58
පෑදෙ/58
ඉපදෙ/58
එළඹෙ/59
පිවිසෙ/59
නියැලෙ/59
තිගැස්සෙ/59
ඈඳෙ/59
මොරදෙ/60
බාරදෙ/60
පෙනෙ/61
තිබෙ/61
ගිලෙ/61
අරගන්/63
අහගන්/63
සමුගන්/63
ගොඩගන්/63
තියාගන්/63
දිනාගන්/63
පිළිගන්/63
භාරගන්/63
හටගන්/63
ගන්/63
පවත්වාගන්/63
හඳුනාගන්/63
කරගන්/63
පනවාගන්/63
